Hawaii statutes.
§417E-9 Penalties. (a) Any person,
including a controlling person of an offeror or target company, who violates
any provision of this chapter or any rule thereunder, or any order of the
commissioner of which this person has notice, shall be subject to a fine of not
more than $25,000 or imprisonment for not more than five years, or both. Each
of the acts specified shall constitute a separate offense and a prosecution or
conviction for any one of such offenses shall not bar prosecution or conviction
for any other offense. No indictment or information may be returned under this
chapter more than six years after the alleged violation.

(b) The commissioner may refer such evidence
as is available concerning violations of this chapter or of any rule or order
hereunder to the attorney general who, with or without any reference, may
institute the appropriate criminal proceedings under this chapter.

(c) Nothing in this chapter limits the power
of the State to punish any person for any conduct which constitutes a crime
under any other statute.

(d) All shares acquired from a Hawaii resident
in violation of any provision of this chapter or any rule hereunder, or any
order of the commissioner of which the person has notice, shall be denied
voting rights for one year after acquisition, the shares shall be
nontransferable on the books of the target company for one year after
acquisition and the target company, during this one-year period, shall have the
option to call the shares for redemption either at the price at which the
shares were acquired or at book value per share as of the last day of the
fiscal quarter ended prior to the date of the call for redemption. Such a
redemption shall occur on the date set in the call notice but not later than
sixty days after the call notice is given. [L 1985, c 32, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next